Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-544
Class IV school district; board of education members; districts; terms; nonpartisan ballot; qualifications.

Candidates for the board of education of a Class IV school district shall be nominated and elected by district as provided in section 32-552 for four-year terms at the same time as members of the city council of the city in which the district is located. A member of the board shall be elected from each district pursuant to such section. Candidates shall be nominated and elected upon a nonpartisan ballot. At the general city election in 1979 and each four years thereafter, one member shall be elected from each even-numbered district. At the general city election in 1981 and each four years thereafter, one member shall be elected from each odd-numbered district. The members shall meet the qualifications found in section 79-543.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 140;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1043.